Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4709
Parental rights; consultation with parent; documentation; family team meeting.

(1) Nothing in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act or the application of the reasonable and prudent parent standard shall affect the parental rights of a parent whose parental rights have not been terminated pursuant to section 43-292 with respect to his or her child.

(2) To the extent possible, a parent shall be consulted about the child’s participation in age or developmentally appropriate activities in the planning process. The department shall document such consultation in the report filed pursuant to subsection (3) of section 43-285.

(3) The child’s participation in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities shall be considered at any family team meeting.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB225, § 14.